Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2822.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2402. Special plate fees The following fees are required: 1. Twenty-five dollars $50 for each original and for each annual renewal of special plates issued under this article, except special plates for hearing impaired persons issued under section 28-2408 and international symbol of access special plates issued under section 28-2409. The fee required by this paragraph shall be distributed as follows: (a) $16 to the department as a special plate administration fee.  The department shall deposit, pursuant to SECTIONs 35-146 and 35-147, this fee in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991. (b) $34 as an annual donation to be deposited in the fund or distributed to the entity that is identified in the section establishing the special plate. 2. $25 for each original and for each renewal of personalized special plates issued pursuant to section 28-2406. 2. 3. Twelve dollars $12 for a transfer of special plates, unless exempt pursuant to section 28-2403. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Conforming legislation The legislative council staff shall prepare proposed legislation conforming the Arizona Revised Statutes to the provisions of this act for consideration in the fifty-eighth legislature, first regular session. Sec. 3. Requirements for enactment; two-thirds vote Pursuant to article IX, section 22, Constitution of Arizona, this act is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and is effective immediately on the signature of the governor or, if the governor vetoes this act, on the subsequent affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.